pl: Nawierzchnia kortu do butów sportowych: Wszystkie nawierzchnie (all court); Sztuczna trawa; Kort dywanowy; Kort ceglany; Kort trawiasty; Kort twardy; Kort kryty (hala); Wielofunkcyjna (multi court); Omni court (sztuczna trawa/piasek); Kort do padla; Inne
sl-SI: Igralna površina za čevlje za športe z loparjem: Za vsa igrišča; Umetna trava; Igrišče s preprogo; Peščeno igrišče; Travnato igrišče; Igrišče s trdo podlago; Dvoransko igrišče; Večnamensko igrišče; Omni igrišče; Igrišče za padel; Drugo
zh-TW: 球拍運動鞋場地表面: 全能球場; 人工草皮; 地毯球場; 紅土球場; 草地球場; 硬地球場; 室內球場; 多功能球場; 全天候球場; 籠式網球場; 其他
hu: Ütősportcipő pályaborítás-típusa: Minden pályatípus; Műfű; Szőnyeg; Salak; Fű; Kemény borítás; Beltéri pálya; Többféle borítás; Omni pálya; Padel pálya; Egyéb
sk-SK: Povrch kurtu pre obuv na raketové športy: Všetky povrchy; Umelá tráva; Koberec; Antuka; Tráva; Tvrdý povrch; Hala; Viacúčelový povrch; Povrch Omni; Padelový kurt; Iné
lt-LT: Raketės sporto batelių aikštelės paviršius: Universalios dangos; Dirbtinės žolės; Kiliminės dangos; Grunto; Žolės; Kietos dangos; Vidaus dangos; Daugiafunkcės dangos; „Omni“ dangos; Padelio dangos; Kita
ro-RO: Tipul suprafeței de joc pentru încălțămintea destinată sporturilor cu rachetă: Toate suprafețele; Iarbă artificială; Teren cu mochetă; Teren de zgură; Teren de iarbă; Teren dur (hard); Teren de interior; Teren multiplu; Teren omni; Teren de padel; Altele
cs: Povrch kurtu pro boty pro raketové sporty: Všechny povrchy; Umělá tráva; Koberec; Antuka; Tráva; Tvrdý povrch; Hala; Víceúčelový povrch; Omni kurt; Padelový kurt; Ostatní
th: รองเท้ากีฬาแร็กเก็ตสำหรับพื้นสนาม: ทุกพื้นผิวสนาม; หญ้าเทียม; สนามพรม; สนามดินเหนียว; สนามหญ้า; สนามฮาร์ดคอร์ต; สนามในร่ม; สนามอเนกประสงค์; สนามออมนิ; สนามพาเดล; อื่นๆ
ko: 라켓 스포츠화 코트 표면: 올 코트; 인조 잔디; 카펫 코트; 클레이 코트; 잔디 코트; 하드 코트; 실내 코트; 멀티 코트; 옴니 코트; 파델 코트; 기타
hr-HR: Površina terena za tenisice s reketima: Svi tereni; Umjetna trava; Tepih; Zemljani teren; Travnati teren; Tvrdi teren; Dvoranski teren; Višenamjenski teren; Omni teren; Padel teren; Ostalo
it: Superficie del campo da gioco per scarpe da racchetta: Tutte le superfici; Erba sintetica; Campo in moquette; Campo in terra battuta; Campo in erba; Campo in cemento; Campo indoor; Multicampo; Campo Omni; Campo da padel; Altro
nl: Racketsportschoen baanoppervlak: Allcourt; Kunstgras; Tapijtbaan; Gravelbaan; Grasbaan; Hardcourt; Binnenbaan; Multicourt; Omnicourt; Padelbaan; Overig
ru: Поверхность корта для обуви ракеточного спорта: Для всех типов кортов; Искусственная трава; Ковер; Грунт; Трава; Хард; Для закрытых помещений; Мультикорт; Омни-корт; Падел-корт; Другое
pt-PT: Superfície do campo para calçado de ténis: Todas as superfícies; Relva sintética; Alcatifa; Terra batida; Relva; Piso duro; Campo interior; Multissuperfícies; Piso omni; Campo de padel; Outro
el: Επιφάνεια γηπέδου για παπούτσια αθλημάτων με ρακέτα: Για όλα τα γήπεδα; Τεχνητό γρασίδι; Γήπεδο με μοκέτα; Χωμάτινο γήπεδο; Γήπεδο με γρασίδι; Σκληρό γήπεδο; Κλειστό γήπεδο; Πολλαπλών γηπέδων; Γήπεδο Omni; Γήπεδο Padel; Άλλο
ja: ラケットスポーツシューズ対応コートサーフェス: オールコート; 人工芝; カーペットコート; クレーコート; グラスコート; ハードコート; インドアコート; マルチコート; オムニコート; パデルコート; その他
pt-BR: Tênis para esporte de raquete superfície da quadra: Todas as quadras; Grama artificial; Quadra de carpete; Quadra de saibro; Quadra de grama; Quadra rápida; Quadra coberta; Multiquadras; Quadra omni; Quadra de padel; Outros
nb: Baneoverflate for racket-sportssko: Alle underlag; Kunstgress; Teppebane; Grusbane; Gressbane; Hardcourt; Innendørsbane; Flerbruksbane; Omnicourt; Padelbane; Annet
es: Superficie de cancha para calzado de deportes de raqueta.: Todas las canchas; Césped artificial; Cancha de moqueta; Cancha de arcilla; Cancha de césped; Cancha dura; Cancha cubierta; Multicancha; Cancha omni; Cancha de pádel; Otro
zh-CN: 球拍运动鞋适用场地: 全场地; 人造草坪; 地毯球场; 红土球场; 草地球场; 硬地球场; 室内球场; 多功能球场; 全天候球场; 笼式网球场; 其他
tr: Raket spor ayakkabısı kort yüzeyi: Tüm kortlar; Suni çim; Halı kort; Toprak kort; Çim kort; Sert kort; Kapalı kort; Çoklu kort; Omni kort; Padel kortu; Diğer
sv: Spelunderlag för racketsportskor: Alla underlag; Konstgräs; Matta; Grus; Gräs; Hardcourt; Inomhusbana; Multibana; Omnicourt; Padelbana; Övrigt
en: Racket sport shoe court surface: All court; Artificial grass; Carpet court; Clay court; Grass court; Hard court; Indoor court; Multi court; Omni court; Padel court; Other
da: Ketsjersportssko, baneoverflade: All court; Kunstgræs; Tæppe; Grusbane; Græsbane; Hardcourt; Indendørs bane; Multibane; Omnibane; Padelbane; Andet
fi: Mailapelikenkien kentän pinta: Kaikki alustat; Tekonurmi; Mattokenttä; Massakenttä; Ruohokenttä; Kovakenttä; Sisäkenttä; Monialusta; Omni-kenttä; Padelkenttä; Muu
de: Platzbelag für Racketsportschuhe: All Court; Kunstrasen; Teppichboden; Sandplatz; Rasenplatz; Hartplatz; Hallenplatz; Multicourt; Omnicourt; Padel-Platz; Sonstige
bg-BG: Тип кортова настилка за обувки за спортове с ракета: За всякакви настилки; Изкуствена трева; Килимна настилка; Клей; Тревна настилка; Твърда настилка; Настилка за зала; Мултифункционална настилка; Омни настилка; Настилка за падел; Друго
fr: Surface de court des chaussures de tennis: Toutes surfaces; Gazon synthétique; Moquette; Terre battue; Gazon; Surface dure; Surface couverte; Multisurface; Surface Omni; Terrain de padel; Autre
vi: Giày thể thao vợt, bề mặt sân: Mọi mặt sân; Sân cỏ nhân tạo; Sân thảm; Sân đất nện; Sân cỏ; Sân cứng; Sân trong nhà; Đa mặt sân; Sân cỏ nhân tạo phủ cát (Omni); Sân padel; Khác